ko: 반려동물 사료 유형: 비스킷; CBD; 쫄깃한; 크런치; 덴탈 제품; 인터렉티브; 종자; 부드러움; 트레이닝; 기타
ro-RO: Tip gustări pentru animale de companie: Biscuiți; CBD; Masticabilă; Crocantă; Dentiție; Interactivă; Semințe; Moale; Antrenament; Altele
es: Tipo de golosina para mascotas: Galletas; CBD; Masticable; Crujiente; Dental; Interactivo; Semillas; Blando; Entrenamiento; Otros
zh-TW: 寵物零食類型: 餅乾; 大麻二酚 (CBD); 耐嚼; 鬆脆; 潔牙零食; 互動式; 種子; 柔軟; 訓練; 其他
hu: Kisállat jutalomfalat típusa: Keksz; CBD; Rágható; Ropogós; Fogerősítő; Interaktív; Magok; Puha; Képzés; Egyéb
zh-CN: 宠物零食类型: 饼干; 大麻二酚; 耐嚼零食; 酥脆零食; 牙齿清洁零食; 互动零食; 种子; 软; 训练零食; 其他
pt-PT: Tipo de guloseimas para animais de estimação: Bolachas; CBD; Borrachudo; Crocante; Para os dentes; Interativo; Sementes; Suave; Treino; Outro
sv: Typ av hundgodis: Kex; CBD; Seg; Knaprig; Dental; Interaktiv; Frön; Mjuk; Träning; Övrigt
bg-BG: Тип лакомство за домашни любимци: Бисквити; CBD; Дъвчащ; Хрупкав; Дентален; Интерактивен; Семена; Мек; Обучение; Други
ja: ペットトリートメントタイプ: ビスケット; CBD; 噛み応えのある; カリカリ; 歯磨き; インタラクティブ; 種子; ソフト; トレーニング; その他
nb: Godbitstype for kjæledyr: Kjeks; CBD; Seig; Knasende; Tanngodbiter; Interaktiv; Frø; Myk; Trening; Annet
de: Art der Tierleckerei: Kekse; CBD; Zäh; Knackig; Dentale Leckerlis; Interaktiv; Saatgut; Weich; Training; Sonstiges
ru: Тип лакомства для домашних животных: Печенье; CBD; Жевательный; Хрустящий; Для зубов; Интерактивный; Семена; Мягкий; Дрессировка; Другой
sl-SI: Vrsta priboljška za hišne ljubljenčke: Piškoti; CBD; Žvečljiv; Hrustljav; Za zobe; Interaktivna; Semena; Mehek; Treniranje; Drugo
nl: Type huisdiertraktatie: Koekjes; CBD; Taai; Knapperig; Tandheelkundig; Interactief; Zaden; Zacht; Training; Andere
sk-SK: Typ maškrty pre domáce zvieratá: Sušienky; CBD; Žuvací; Chrumkavý; Zubný; Interaktívny; Semená; Mäkký; Trénovanie; Iné
lt-LT: Skanėstų augintiniams rūšis: Sausainiai; Kanabinoidai; Kramtomas; Traškus; Odontologinis; Interaktyvus; Sėklos; Minkštas; Mokomasis; Kita
fi: Lemmikkiherkun rakenne: Keksit; CBD; Sitkeä; Rapea; Hammashoitoherkut; Interaktiivinen; Siemenet; Pehmeä; Koulutus; Muu
tr: Evcil hayvan ödülü türü: Bisküvi; CBD; Çiğnenebilir; Gevrek; Dişleme; İnteraktif; Tohumlar; Yumuşak; Eğitim; Diğer
fr: Type de friandise pour animaux de compagnie: Biscuits; CBD; Moelleux; Croquant; Dentaire; Interactif; Graines; Doux; Entraînement; Autre
pt-BR: Tipo de guloseima para animais de estimação: Biscoitos; CBD; Mastigável; Crocante; Dental; Interativo; Sementes; Macio; Treinamento; Outro
el: Τύπος λιχουδιάς για κατοικίδια: Μπισκότα; CBD; Λαστιχωτή; Τραγανή; Οδοντιατρική; Αλληλεπίδραση; Σπόροι; Μαλακό; Προπόνησης; Άλλο
vi: Loại bánh thưởng cho thú cưng: Bánh quy; CBD; Nhai; Cứng và giòn; Bánh thưởng làm sạch răng; Tương tác; Hạt giống; Mềm; Đào tạo; Khác
da: Type af godbidder til kæledyr: Kiks; CBD; Tyggehård; Sprødt; Tandhygiejne; Interaktiv; Frø; Blød; Træning; Andet
cs: Typ pamlsku pro domácí mazlíčky: Sušenky; CBD; Tuhé; Křupavé; Dentální; Interaktivní; Semena; Měkká; Trénink; Jiné
it: Tipo di dolcetto per animali domestici: Biscotti; CBD; Gommoso; Croccante; Dentale; Interattivo; Semi; Morbida; Allenamento; Altro
th: ประเภทอาหารสัตว์เลี้ยง: บิสกิต; CBD; เหนียวนุ่ม; กรุบกรอบ; ขนมขัดฟัน; แบบโต้ตอบ; เมล็ดพืช; นุ่ม; สำหรับฝึก; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Vrsta poslastice za kućne ljubimce: Keksi; CBD; Za žvakanje; Hrskava; Dentalna; Interaktivna; Sjemenke; Meka; Za dresuru; Ostalo
pl: Rodzaj smakołyków dla zwierząt: Ciasteczka; CBD; Do żucia; Chrupki; Przysmaki do pielęgnacji zębów; Interaktywne; Nasiona; Miękki; Do szkolenia; Inne
en: Pet treat type: Biscuits; CBD; Chewy; Crunchy; Dental; Interactive; Seeds; Soft; Training; Other